Indiana, session 2026, SB185.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
1 SECTION 1. IC 7.1-3-18.5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.32-2019,
2 SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
3 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) A person may not sell or otherwise
4 distribute in exchange for consideration a tobacco product or electronic
5 cigarette at retail or wholesale without a valid tobacco sales certificate
6 issued by the commission.
7 (b) A certificate may be issued only to a person who owns or
8 operates at least one (1) of the following:
9 (1) A premises consisting of a permanent building or structure
10 where the tobacco product or electronic cigarette is sold or
11 distributed.
12 (2) A premises upon which a cigarette vending machine is
13 located.
14 (c) For purposes of subsection (b)(1), a permitted premises may
15 not include sleeping or living quarters.
16 SECTION 2. IC 7.1-3-18.5-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
17 CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

2
1 [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) A person may not sell
2 tobacco products or electronic cigarettes at wholesale or
3 participate in the wholesale distribution of tobacco products or
4 electronic cigarettes without a valid wholesale tobacco sales
5 certificate issued by the commission.
6 (b) The commission may only issue a wholesale tobacco sales
7 certificate to a person who owns or operates a wholesale tobacco
8 business at a premises consisting of a permanent building or
9 structure that is used for the wholesale distribution of tobacco
10 products or electronic cigarettes.
11 SECTION 3. IC 7.1-3-18.5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.107-2024,
12 SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
13 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A person who desires a certificate must
14 provide the following to the commission:
15 (1) The applicant's name and mailing address and the address of
16 the premises for which the certificate is being issued.
17 (2) Except as provided in section 6(c) of this chapter, a fee of:
18 (A) two hundred dollars ($200) for a retail tobacco sales
19 certificate; or
20 (B) one hundred dollars ($100) for a wholesale tobacco
21 sales certificate.
22 (3) The name under which the applicant transacts or intends to
23 transact business.
24 (4) The address of the applicant's principal place of business or
25 headquarters, if any.
26 (5) The statement required under section 2.6 of this chapter.
27 (6) If the applicant is applying for a new certificate under section
28 3.2 of this chapter, a copy of each of the following:
29 (A) If the new ownership of the business is a business entity,
30 the articles of incorporation, articles of organization, or any
31 other formation documents of the business entity.
32 (B) If the new ownership of the business is an individual,
33 either:
34 (i) the sales or purchase agreement; or
35 (ii) an affidavit signed by the applicant concerning the sale
36 or purchase, on a form prescribed by the commission, that
37 includes the name and address of the seller and purchaser.
38 (C) The certificate held by the previous ownership of the
39 business.
40 (7) A photocopy of the owner's driver's license, identification
41 card issued under IC 9-24-16-1, a similar card issued under
42 the laws of another state or the federal government, or
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

3
1 another government issued document that bears the owner's
2 photograph and birth date. If the applicant is a business with
3 multiple owners, the applicant must designate at least one (1)
4 managing owner for whom a photocopy of the managing
5 owner's identification must be provided under this
6 subdivision.
7 (b) A separate certificate is required for each location where the
8 tobacco products or electronic cigarettes are sold or distributed. A retail
9 An establishment may not hold more than one (1) active tobacco sales
10 certificate for a retail location at any time. Except when the real estate
11 for a retail location is transferred to an independent third party,
12 the commission shall not issue a certificate to a retail location
13 where a tobacco sales certificate was revoked within one (1) year
14 prior to the date of the application.
15 (c) A certificate holder shall conspicuously display the holder's
16 certificate on the holder's premises where the tobacco products or
17 electronic cigarettes are sold or distributed.
18 (d) Any intentional misstatement or suppression of a material fact
19 in an application filed under this section constitutes grounds for denial
20 or revocation of the certificate.
21 (e) A certificate may be issued only to a person who meets the
22 following requirements:
23 (1) If the person is an individual, the person must be at least
24 twenty-one (21) years of age.
25 (2) The person must be authorized to do business in Indiana.
26 (3) The person has not had an interest in a certificate revoked by
27 the commission for that business location within the preceding
28 one (1) year.
29 (f) The fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the
30 enforcement and administration fund under IC 7.1-4-10.
31 SECTION 4. IC 7.1-3-18.5-9.2, AS ADDED BY P.L.107-2024,
32 SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
33 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9.2. (a) An employee of a certificate holder must
34 hold a valid:
35 (1) driver's license issued by the state of Indiana or another state;
36 or
37 (2) identification card issued by the state of Indiana, another state,
38 or the United States;
39 to sell tobacco products.
40 (b) An employee must have the employee's driver's license or
41 identification card or a copy of the employee's driver's license or
42 identification card:
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

4
1 (1) either:
2 (A) in the employee's possession; or
3 (B) on file with the employee's employer; and
4 (2) upon request, readily available to show to an excise officer or
5 law enforcement;
6 when selling tobacco products.
7 (c) If an employee holds a valid license or identification card as
8 described in subsection (a) but is unable to show the license,
9 identification card, or a copy to an excise officer under subsection (b)
10 because:
11 (1) the employee has left the license, identification card, or copy
12 in another location; or
13 (2) the license, identification card, or copy has otherwise been lost
14 or mislaid;
15 the employee may, within five (5) days of the employee's inability to
16 show the license, identification card, or copy to the excise officer,
17 produce to the excise officer or to the office of the commission
18 satisfactory evidence of a license or identification card issued to the
19 individual that was valid at the time the individual was unable to show
20 the license, identification card, or copy.
21 (d) If an employee who is unable to show a license, identification
22 card, or copy to an excise officer fails to produce satisfactory evidence
23 within five (5) days in the manner described in subsection (c), the
24 commission may impose a civil penalty on the certificate holder under
25 IC 7.1-3-23-3.
26 (e) The commission shall take the following actions with respect
27 to a certificate holder's certificate if the certificate holder's
28 employees violate this section:
29 (1) For three (3) violations in a one (1) year period, suspend
30 the certificate for a period of five (5) days.
31 (2) For four (4) violations in a one (1) year period, suspend the
32 certificate for a period of an additional five (5) days.
33 (3) For five (5) violations in a one (1) year period, suspend the
34 certificate for a period of an additional five (5) days.
35 (4) For six (6) or more violations in a one (1) year period,
36 revoke the certificate.
37 SECTION 5. IC 7.1-5-10-23, AS AMENDED BY P.L.32-2019,
38 SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
39 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. It is a Class C infraction for a permittee,
40 certificate holder, or an employee or agent of a permittee or
41 certificate holder to recklessly, knowingly, or intentionally sell, barter,
42 exchange, provide, or furnish another person who is or reasonably
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

5
1 appears to be less than forty (40) years of age an alcoholic beverage or
2 tobacco product for consumption off the licensed premises without
3 first requiring the person to produce:
4 (1) a driver's license;
5 (2) an identification card issued under IC 9-24-16-1 or a similar
6 card issued under the laws of another state or the federal
7 government; or
8 (3) a government issued document;
9 bearing the person's photograph and birth date showing that the person
10 is at least twenty-one (21) years of age.
11 SECTION 6. IC 7.1-7-1-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
12 AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
13 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. (a) An e-liquid or e-liquid product manufactured,
14 distributed, or sold in Indiana must adhere to all applicable rules
15 and regulations of the federal Food and Drug Administration,
16 including those rules and regulations regarding product safety,
17 labeling, and manufacturing standards.
18 (b) Except as otherwise provided in this article, this article does
19 not require a product subject to this article to be specifically
20 approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration if the
21 product satisfies all applicable rules and regulations.
22 (c) If a product subject to this article is approved by the federal
23 Food and Drug Administration, the approval constitutes prima
24 facie evidence of compliance with this article.
25 SECTION 7. IC 7.1-7-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
26 SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
27 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), This
28 article applies to the following:
29 (1) The commercial manufacturing, bottling, selling, sale,
30 bartering, or importing, possession, and use of e-liquid and
31 e-liquid products in Indiana, including through a cigarette
32 vending machine.
33 (2) The sale, possession, and use of e-liquid products in Indiana.
34 (b) This article does not apply to a manufacturer of a closed system
35 vapor product, except as specifically provided in this article.
36 SECTION 8. IC 7.1-7-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
37 SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
38 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The purpose of this article is to protect public
39 health and safety by:
40 (1) ensuring the safety and security of e-liquid and e-liquid
41 products manufactured for sale in Indiana;
42 (2) ensuring that e-liquid and e-liquid products manufactured or
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

6
1 sold in Indiana conforms conform to appropriate standards of
2 identity, strength, quality, and purity; and
3 (3) ensuring that e-liquid and e-liquid products is are not
4 contaminated or adulterated by the inclusion of ingredients or
5 other substances that might pose unreasonable threats to public
6 health and safety; and
7 (4) ensuring dangerous foreign adversary products are not
8 sold or distributed in Indiana.
9 SECTION 9. IC 7.1-7-2-6.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2020,
10 SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
11 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.3. "Delivery sale" means a sale of an e-liquid,
12 an e-liquid product, or a vapor device to a purchaser in Indiana in
13 which the purchaser submits the order for the sale:
14 (1) by telephone;
15 (2) over the Internet; or
16 (3) through the mail or another delivery system;
17 and the e-liquid, e-liquid product, or vapor device is shipped through
18 a delivery service. "Delivery sale" does not include a sale of an
19 e-liquid, an e-liquid product, or a vapor device not for personal
20 consumption to a person who is a retailer.
21 SECTION 10. IC 7.1-7-2-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
22 2026]. Sec. 8. "Distributor" means a person who is licensed under
23 IC 6-7-2-8 that:
24 (1) distributes, sells, barters, or exchanges e-liquid in Indiana to
25 retail dealers for the purpose of resale; or
26 (2) purchases e-liquid directly from a manufacturer for the
27 purpose of resale.
28 SECTION 11. IC 7.1-7-2-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
29 SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
30 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. "E-liquid" means a substance that:
31 (1) may or may not contain nicotine; and
32 (2) is intended to be vaporized and inhaled using a vapor product.
33 device.
34 SECTION 12. IC 7.1-7-2-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
35 CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
36 [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. "E-liquid product" means
37 a vapor device that contains e-liquid, with or without nicotine.
38 SECTION 13. IC 7.1-7-2-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
39 SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
40 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. "Flavoring" means a food grade additive or
41 synthetic flavoring substance that is used to add flavor and that is not
42 prohibited by the federal Food and Drug Administration as an additive
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

7
1 in vapor products. e-liquid or e-liquid products.
2 SECTION 14. IC 7.1-7-2-12.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
3 CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
4 [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.3. "Foreign adversary" means
5 an individual, business entity, or other entity located in or
6 organized under the laws of a nation listed as a foreign adversary
7 in 15 CFR 791.4.
8 SECTION 15. IC 7.1-7-2-12.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
9 CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
10 [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.5. (a) "Foreign adversary
11 product" means an:
12 (1) e-liquid;
13 (2) e-liquid containing an ingredient; or
14 (3) e-liquid product;
15 that is manufactured by, sourced from, or otherwise imported
16 from a nation listed as a foreign adversary in 15 CFR 791.4.
17 (b) The term does not include the following:
18 (1) A vapor device, including a part to be utilized in an open
19 or closed system to convert e-liquid to a vapor for inhalation.
20 (2) E-liquid or an e-liquid product that is manufactured by,
21 sourced from, or otherwise imported from a nation listed as
22 a foreign adversary in 15 CFR 791.4, if the e-liquid or e-liquid
23 product:
24 (A) has been approved or authorized be the federal Food
25 and Drug Administration; or
26 (B) is pending review by the federal Food and Drug
27 Administration under 21 U.S.C. 387j.
28 SECTION 16. IC 7.1-7-2-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
29 SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
30 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. "Manufacturer" means a person located inside
31 or outside Indiana that is engaged in manufacturing:
32 (1) e-liquid for closed and open system vapor devices; or
33 (2) e-liquid products.
34 SECTION 17. IC 7.1-7-2-15.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
35 1, 2026]. Sec. 15.5. "Manufacturer of a closed system vapor product"
36 means a manufacturer of vapor products whose closed system vapor
37 products are for sale in Indiana, but that does not produce open system
38 vapor products that are for sale in Indiana.
39 SECTION 18. IC 7.1-7-2-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
40 SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
41 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. "Manufacturing" means the process by which
42 an:
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

8
1 (1) e-liquid is mixed, bottled, and packaged; and
2 (2) e-liquid product is produced and packaged.
3 SECTION 19. IC 7.1-7-2-18, AS ADDED BY P.L.176-2015,
4 SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
5 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. "Permit" means a written authorization issued
6 by the commission entitling the holder to manufacture, sell, or
7 otherwise deal in e-liquid or e-liquid products, as provided in this
8 article.
9 SECTION 20. IC 7.1-7-2-21, AS ADDED BY P.L.176-2015,
10 SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
11 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 21. "Retailer" means a person, other than a
12 manufacturer, who in the ordinary course of the person's regular trade
13 or business:
14 (1) acquires any form of e-liquid or e-liquid product for the
15 purpose of resale; and
16 (2) transfers the e-liquid or e-liquid product to another person
17 for money or other consideration.
18 SECTION 21. IC 7.1-7-2-23, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
19 SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
20 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. "Vapor product" device" means a powered
21 vaporizer that converts e-liquid to a vapor intended for inhalation. The
22 term includes both open and closed system vapor devices.
23 SECTION 22. IC 7.1-7-2-24 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
24 AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
25 1, 2026]: Sec. 24. "Wholesaler" means a person who has obtained
26 or is required to obtain a wholesale tobacco sales certificate under
27 IC 7.1-3-18.5-1.5 that:
28 (1) distributes, sells, barters, or exchanges e-liquid or e-liquid
29 products in Indiana to retail dealers for the purpose of resale;
30 or
31 (2) purchases e-liquid or e-liquid products directly from a
32 manufacturer for the purpose of resale to resellers.
33 SECTION 23. IC 7.1-7-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
34 SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
35 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The commission has the following duties and
36 responsibilities:
37 (1) To require the submission of information necessary to
38 implement this article.
39 (2) To issue permits.
40 (3) To charge fees as set forth in this article. The fees charged
41 under this subdivision may not exceed the actual costs incurred by
42 the commission.
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

9
1 (4) To approve or deny a permit application made under
2 IC 7.1-7-4 within sixty (60) days of receiving the application.
3 SECTION 24. IC 7.1-7-4-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2020,
4 SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
5 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Not later than January 1, 2027, a
6 manufacturer of e-liquid or an e-liquid product that is
7 manufactured or sold in Indiana must obtain a permit under this
8 section.
9 (a) (b) A manufacturer of e-liquid may not mix, bottle, package, or
10 sell e-liquid to retailers, consumers, or distributors wholesalers in
11 Indiana without a permit issued by the commission under this article.
12 (b) An e-liquid manufactured by an e-liquids manufacturer
13 approved by the commission under this article before July 1, 2017, may
14 be distributed and sold for retail until the expiration date of the
15 e-liquid.
16 (c) A manufacturing permit issued by the commission before July
17 1, 2026, is valid for five (5) years. A manufacturing permit issued by
18 the commission after June 30, 2026, is valid for two (2) years. A
19 manufacturing permit issued by the commission under this article
20 before July 1, 2017, does not expire before July 1, 2020.
21 (d) An initial application for a manufacturing permit must include
22 the following:
23 (1) The name, telephone number, and address of the applicant.
24 (2) The name, telephone number, and address of the
25 manufacturing facility.
26 (3) The name, telephone number, title, and address of the person
27 responsible for the manufacturing facility.
28 (4) Verification that the facility will comply with applicable
29 tobacco products good manufacturing practices promulgated
30 under 21 U.S.C. 387f(e) of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic
31 Act.
32 (5) Verification that the manufacturer will comply with the
33 applicable ingredient listing required by 21 U.S.C. 387d(a)(1) of
34 the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.
35 (6) Written consent allowing the state police department to
36 conduct a state or national criminal history background check on
37 any person listed on the application.
38 (7) A nonrefundable initial application fee of one thousand dollars
39 ($1,000). three thousand dollars ($3,000).
40 (8) Verification that the manufacturer will comply with all
41 other state and federal laws related to e-liquids and e-liquid
42 products.
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

10
1 (9) An affirmation, made under the penalties for perjury, that
2 the manufacturer will not, to the best of the manufacturer's
3 knowledge, use any ingredients or e-liquids in the
4 manufacturer's manufacturing process from a nation listed as
5 a foreign adversary in 15 CFR 791.4.
6 (10) Evidence of the federal Food and Drug Administration
7 approval, authorization, or application status of each e-liquid
8 or e-liquid product the manufacturer seeks to sell, source,
9 import, or manufacture in the manner described under
10 IC 7.1-7-2-12.5(b)(2).
11 (e) The fees collected under subsection (d)(7) shall be deposited in
12 the enforcement and administration fund established under IC 7.1-4-10.
13 (f) Except as otherwise provided in this article, an applicant for
14 a permit under this section must adhere to all state and federal
15 laws applicable to e-liquids and e-liquid products, including rules
16 and regulations promulgated by the federal Food and Drug
17 Administration.
18 (g) If the federal Food and Drug Administration denies a
19 manufacturer's application for approval or authorization of an
20 e-liquid or e-liquid product during the term of a permit issued
21 under this section, the manufacturer must notify the commission
22 of the denial and submit a supplemental application for a
23 manufacturing permit on a form prescribed by the commission.
24 SECTION 25. IC 7.1-7-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
25 SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
26 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A manufacturing permit that is renewed by
27 the commission before July 1, 2026, is valid for five (5) years. A
28 manufacturing permit that is renewed by the commission after
29 June 30, 2026, is valid for two (2) years.
30 (b) A renewal application for a manufacturing permit must include
31 the following:
32 (1) The name, telephone number, and address of the applicant.
33 (2) The name, telephone number, and address of the
34 manufacturing facility.
35 (3) The name, telephone number, title, and address of the person
36 responsible for the manufacturing facility.
37 (4) Verification that the facility complies with all tobacco
38 products good manufacturing practices:
39 (A) set forth in; and
40 (B) promulgated in federal rules under;
41 21 U.S.C. 387f through 21 U.S.C. 387u of the federal Food, Drug,
42 and Cosmetic Act.
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

11
1 (5) Written consent allowing the state police department to
2 conduct a state or national criminal history background check on
3 any person listed on the application.
4 (6) A nonrefundable renewal application fee of five hundred
5 dollars ($500). one thousand dollars ($1,000).
6 (7) Verification that the manufacturer will comply with all
7 other state and federal laws related to e-liquids and e-liquid
8 products.
9 (8) An affirmation, made under the penalties for perjury, that
10 the manufacturer will not, to the best of the manufacturer's
11 knowledge, use any ingredients or e-liquids in the
12 manufacturer's manufacturing process from a nation listed as
13 a foreign adversary in 15 CFR 791.4.
14 (9) Evidence of the federal Food and Drug Administration
15 approval, authorization, or application status of each e-liquid
16 or e-liquid product the manufacturer seeks to sell, source,
17 import, or manufacture in the manner described under
18 IC 7.1-7-2-12.5(b)(2).
19 (c) The fees collected under subsection (b)(6) shall be deposited in
20 the enforcement and administration fund established under IC 7.1-4-10.
21 (d) If the federal Food and Drug Administration denies a
22 manufacturer's application for approval or authorization of an
23 e-liquid or e-liquid product during the term of a permit issued
24 under this section, the manufacturer must notify the commission
25 of the denial and submit a supplemental renewal application for a
26 manufacturing permit on a form prescribed by the commission.
27 SECTION 26. IC 7.1-7-4-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.17-2019,
28 SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
29 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) As used in this section:
30 (1) "adulterated" means a product that:
31 (A) consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or
32 decomposed substance; or
33 (B) is contaminated by any added poisonous or added
34 deleterious substance that may render the product injurious to
35 health; and or
36 (C) is a foreign adversary product; and
37 (2) "tamper evident package" means a package having at least one
38 (1) indicator or barrier to entry that, if breached or missing, can
39 reasonably be expected to provide visible evidence to consumers
40 that tampering has occurred.
41 (b) A manufacturing facility shall comply with the following
42 requirements:
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

12
1 (1) An e-liquid container must use a child proof cap that has the
2 child resistant effectiveness set forth in the federal poison
3 prevention packaging standards, 16 CFR 1700.15(b)(1).
4 (2) An e-liquid container or e-liquid product must use a tamper
5 evident package. The tamper evident package feature must be
6 designed to and remain intact when handled in a reasonable
7 manner during the manufacture, distribution, and retail display of
8 the e-liquid container or e-liquid product.
9 (3) The label on an e-liquid container or e-liquid product must
10 meet the nicotine addictiveness warning statement requirements
11 set forth in 21 CFR 1143.3.
12 (4) The manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer may not add an
13 adulterated product to any e-liquid or e-liquid product produced
14 for sale in Indiana.
15 (5) The manufacturer must submit to random site visits by the
16 commission.
17 (6) The manufacturer may:
18 (A) own and control both the e-liquid or e-liquid product
19 manufacturing process and the bottling process; or
20 (B) subcontract with another manufacturer for the performance
21 of the e-liquid or e-liquid product manufacturing service, the
22 bottling services, or both services.
23 However, both the manufacturer performing a service under
24 clause (B) and the manufacturer for which the service is
25 performed must meet the requirements of this article, including
26 obtaining a permit.
27 (7) A manufacturer may use a flavoring, as defined by
28 IC 7.1-7-2-12, as an ingredient in an e-liquid or e-liquid product.
29 (8) The manufacturer or any person listed on the permit
30 application may not have been convicted within ten (10) years
31 before the date of application of:
32 (A) a federal crime having a sentence of at least one (1) year;
33 (B) an Indiana Class A, Class B, or Class C felony (for a crime
34 committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3,
35 Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a crime committed after June
36 30, 2014);
37 (C) a crime in a state other than Indiana having a penalty equal
38 to the penalty for an Indiana Class A, Class B, or Class C
39 felony (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level
40 1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a crime
41 committed after June 30, 2014);
42 (D) an Indiana Class D felony involving a controlled substance
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

13
1 under IC 35-48-4 (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014)
2 or a Level 6 felony involving a controlled substance under
3 IC 35-48-4 (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014); or
4 (E) a crime in a state other than Indiana similar to a Class D
5 felony involving a controlled substance under IC 35-48-4 (for
6 a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 6 felony
7 involving a controlled substance under IC 35-48-4 (for a crime
8 committed after June 30, 2014).
9 SECTION 27. IC 7.1-7-4-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
10 AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
11 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) A manufacturer that is permitted or required
12 to be permitted under this chapter may not manufacture, source,
13 possess, sell, or otherwise distribute a foreign adversary product.
14 (b) A retailer that holds or is required to hold a tobacco sales
15 certificate under IC 7.1-3-18.5-1 may not possess, sell, or otherwise
16 distribute a foreign adversary product.
17 (c) A wholesaler that holds or is required to hold a wholesale
18 tobacco sales certificate under IC 7.1-3-18.5-1.5 may not possess,
19 sell, or otherwise distribute a foreign adversary product.
20 SECTION 28. IC 7.1-7-5.5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2020,
21 SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
22 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. A retailer may not make a delivery sale of
23 e-liquid, an e-liquid product, or a vapor device to an individual who
24 does not meet the minimum age requirement as set forth in
25 IC 7.1-7-6-5.
26 SECTION 29. IC 7.1-7-5-1.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.220-2023,
27 SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
28 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.1. (a) A retailer must have a valid sales
29 certificate issued by the commission in accordance with
30 IC 7.1-3-18.5-1 that contains a separate box to check for identifying a
31 retailer that sells e-liquids or e-liquid products.
32 (b) A retailer may purchase e-liquid or an e-liquid product only
33 from an Indiana e-liquid manufacturing permit holder or an Indiana
34 distributor wholesaler permit holder.
35 (c) A retailer shall retain all invoices for e-liquid and e-liquid
36 products that the retailer purchases for two (2) years.
37 (d) A retailer shall not allow the self-service sale for individuals
38 purchasing an e-liquid or e-liquid product.
39 (e) A retailer may not sell an e-liquid or e-liquid product that
40 contains more than seventy-five (75) milligrams per milliliter of
41 nicotine.
42 (f) A manufacturer must have an e-liquid a manufacturing permit
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

14
1 issued under IC 7.1-7-4.
2 (g) A distributor wholesaler that does not have a valid e-liquid
3 manufacturing permit issued under IC 7.1-7-4 must have a valid
4 distributor's license wholesale tobacco sales certificate issued under
5 IC 6-7-2-8. IC 7.1-3-18.5-1.5.
6 (h) A distributor wholesaler shall purchase and distribute e-liquid
7 or e-liquid products from an:
8 (1) Indiana e-liquid manufacturer that has a valid e-liquid
9 manufacturing permit under IC 7.1-7-4; or
10 (2) Indiana e-liquid distributor wholesaler that has a valid:
11 (A) e-liquid manufacturing permit issued under IC 7.1-7-4; or
12 (B) distributor's license wholesale tobacco sales certificate
13 under IC 6-7-2-8. IC 7.1-3-18.5-1.5.
14 (i) A distributor wholesaler shall retain all invoices to a retailer or
15 from a manufacturer for at least two (2) years.
16 (j) A manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, or retailer may not
17 market e-liquid or an e-liquid product as a modified risk tobacco
18 product, as defined by IC 7.1-7-2-17.5, that has not been designated as
19 a modified risk tobacco product by the federal Food and Drug
20 Administration.
21 (k) Except as provided in subsection (m), a manufacturer including
22 a manufacturer of a closed system vapor product, permitted or
23 required to be permitted under IC 7.1-7-4 shall annually submit a
24 report to the commission setting forth:
25 (1) each new product that the manufacturer is producing and is
26 sold in Indiana with a list of the contents and ingredients by
27 volume; and
28 (2) whether the manufacturer has stopped producing products
29 previously produced and sold in Indiana.
30 A report under this subsection is confidential, and the commission may
31 not disclose it to another person.
32 (l) A manufacturer permitted or required to be permitted under
33 IC 7.1-7-4 shall annually submit a report to the commission setting
34 forth:
35 (1) the milligrams per milliliter of nicotine in each product the
36 manufacturer produces; and
37 (2) the milliliters of each product sold that current year.
38 A report under this subsection is confidential, and the ATC
39 commission may not disclose it to another person.
40 (m) A manufacturer is not required to submit a report described in
41 subsection (k) if the manufacturer submits to the commission a
42 certification, by October 1 of each year, that each of the manufacturer's
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

15
1 vapor products e-liquid or e-liquid products sold in Indiana has have
2 been filed with the federal Food and Drug Administration.
3 SECTION 30. IC 7.1-7-5-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.176-2015,
4 SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
5 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A manufacturer of e-liquid may file a
6 request with the Indiana department of health for approval of an
7 ingredient to be allowed in the composition of e-liquid.
8 (b) The Indiana department of health may approve the request filed
9 under subsection (a) if the department determines that the ingredient
10 will not pose an unreasonable threat to public health and safety.
11 SECTION 31. IC 7.1-7-5.5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2020,
12 SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
13 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. A retailer may not ship an e-liquid, an e-liquid
14 product, or a vapor device without first making a good faith effort to
15 verify the age of the purchaser of the e-liquid, e-liquid product, or
16 vapor device as set forth in IC 7.1-7-6-6.
17 SECTION 32. IC 7.1-7-5.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2020,
18 SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
19 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Before an e-liquid or e-liquid product is
20 shipped in a delivery sale, a retailer must be fully paid for the purchase
21 and shall accept payment from the purchaser:
22 (1) by a check drawn on an account in the purchaser's name;
23 (2) by a credit card issued in the purchaser's name; or
24 (3) by a debit card issued in the purchaser's name.
25 (b) A retailer may ship an e-liquid or e-liquid product only to a
26 purchaser.
27 SECTION 33. IC 7.1-7-5.5-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2020,
28 SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
29 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. A retailer who ships an e-liquid, an e-liquid
30 product, or a vapor device from a delivery sale order shall include as
31 part of the shipping documents a document with the following
32 statement: "E-LIQUIDS: Indiana law prohibits the sale of this product
33 to a person who is less than 21 years of age.".
34 SECTION 34. IC 7.1-7-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
35 SECTION 31, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
36 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) If a manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler,
37 or retailer violates any provision of this article, the manufacturer,
38 distributor, wholesaler, or retailer may be reprimanded, assessed a
39 civil penalty, or have the manufacturer's permit, distributor's license,
40 wholesaler's tobacco sales certificate, or retailer's tobacco sales
41 certificate suspended by the commission.
42 (b) Any provision in this article that requires a manufacturer,
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

16
1 wholesaler, or retailer to comply with the federal Food, Drug, and
2 Cosmetic Act or a federal rule promulgated under the federal Food,
3 Drug, and Cosmetic Act is under the sole jurisdiction of the federal
4 Food and Drug Administration. If the federal Food and Drug
5 Administration seeks court enforcement of any section of the federal
6 Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act cited in this article and a civil monetary
7 penalty is assessed against the manufacturer, the act or omission for
8 which the penalty was assessed constitutes a violation of this article.
9 The commission shall revoke the permit, tobacco sales certificate,
10 or wholesaler tobacco sales certificate of a manufacturer,
11 wholesaler, or retailer that violates the federal Food, Drug, and
12 Cosmetic Act or a federal rule promulgated under the federal
13 Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.
14 (c) The commission may assess a civil penalty against a
15 manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, or retailer for a violation of this
16 article in an amount that does not exceed ten thousand dollars
17 ($10,000). A civil penalty may be assessed in addition to other
18 penalties allowed under this article.
19 SECTION 35. IC 7.1-7-6-2.1, AS ADDED BY P.L.49-2020,
20 SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
21 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.1. A person who sells or distributes an e-liquid,
22 an e-liquid product, or a vapor device to a person less than
23 twenty-one (21) years of age may be in violation of IC 35-46-1.
24 SECTION 36. IC 7.1-7-6-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2020,
25 SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
26 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. A person who knowingly or intentionally makes
27 a delivery sale of an e-liquid, e-liquid product, or a vapor device to
28 an individual who is less than twenty-one (21) years of age commits a
29 Class C infraction.
30 SECTION 37. IC 7.1-7-6-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2020,
31 SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
32 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) As used in this section, "good faith effort to
33 verify the age of the purchaser of the e-liquid, e-liquid product, or
34 vapor device" means:
35 (1) verifying the age of the purchaser in a commercially available
36 database; or
37 (2) obtaining a photocopy of a government issued identification;
38 that indicates the birth date or age of the purchaser.
39 (b) A person who knowingly or intentionally ships an e-liquid, an
40 e-liquid product, or a vapor device without first making a good faith
41 effort to verify the age of the purchaser of the e-liquid, e-liquid
42 product, or vapor device commits a Class C infraction.
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

17
1 SECTION 38. IC 24-3-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.217-2017,
2 SECTION 154, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
3 [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. Unless the context in this chapter
4 requires otherwise, the term:
5 (a) "Cigarette" shall mean and include any roll for smoking made
6 wholly or in part of tobacco, irrespective of size or shape and
7 irrespective of tobacco being flavored, adulterated, or mixed with any
8 other ingredient, where such roll has a wrapper or cover made of paper
9 or any other material; provided the definition in this paragraph shall not
10 be construed to include cigars.
11 (b) "Person" or the term "company", used in this chapter
12 interchangeably, means and includes any individual, assignee, receiver,
13 commissioner, fiduciary, trustee, executor, administrator, institution,
14 bank, consignee, firm, partnership, limited liability company, joint
15 vendor, pool, syndicate, bureau, association, cooperative association,
16 society, club, fraternity, sorority, lodge, corporation, municipal
17 corporation, or other political subdivision of the state engaged in
18 private or proprietary activities or business, estate, trust, or any other
19 group or combination acting as a unit, and the plural as well as the
20 singular number, unless the intention to give a more limited meaning
21 is disclosed by the context.
22 (c) "Distributor" shall mean and include every person who sells,
23 barters, exchanges, or distributes cigarettes in the state of Indiana to
24 retail dealers for the purpose of resale, or who purchases for resale
25 cigarettes from a manufacturer of cigarettes or from a wholesaler,
26 jobber, or distributor outside the state of Indiana who is not a
27 distributor holding a registration certificate issued under the provisions
28 of IC 6-7-1.
29 (d) "Retailer" shall mean every person, other than a distributor, who
30 purchases, sells, offers for sale, or distributes cigarettes to consumers
31 or to any person for any purpose other than resale, irrespective of
32 quantity or amount or the number of sales.
33 (e) "Sell at retail", "sale at retail", and "retail sales" shall mean and
34 include any transfer of title to cigarettes for a valuable consideration
35 made in the ordinary course of trade or usual conduct of the seller's
36 business to the purchaser for consummation or use.
37 (f) "Sell at wholesale", "sale at wholesale", and "wholesale sales"
38 shall mean and include any transfer of title to cigarettes for a valuable
39 consideration made in the ordinary course of trade or usual conduct of
40 a distributor's business.
41 (g) "Basic cost of cigarettes" shall mean the invoice cost of
42 cigarettes to the retailer or distributor, as the case may be, or the
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

18
1 replacement cost of cigarettes to the retailer or distributor, as the case
2 may be, within thirty (30) days prior to the date of sale, in the quantity
3 last purchased, whichever is the lower, less all trade discounts and
4 customary discounts for cash, plus the cost at full face value of any
5 stamps which may be required by IC 6-7-1, if not included by the
6 manufacturer in his selling price to the distributor.
7 (h) "Department" shall mean the alcohol and tobacco commission
8 or its duly authorized assistants and employees.
9 (i) "Cost to the retailer" shall mean the basic cost of cigarettes to the
10 retailer, plus the cost of doing business by the retailer as evidenced by
11 the standards and methods of accounting regularly employed by him in
12 his allocation of overhead costs and expenses paid or incurred and must
13 include without limitation labor (including salaries of executives and
14 officers), rent, depreciation, selling costs, maintenance of equipment,
15 delivery costs, all types of licenses, taxes, insurance, and advertising;
16 however, any retailer who, in connection with the retailer's purchase,
17 receives not only the discounts ordinarily allowed upon purchases by
18 a retailer, but also, in whole or in part, discounts ordinarily allowed on
19 purchases by a distributor shall, in determining costs to the retailer
20 pursuant to this section, add the cost to the distributor, as defined in
21 paragraph (j), to the basic cost of cigarettes to said retailer as well as
22 the cost of doing business by the retailer. In the absence of proof of a
23 lesser or higher cost of doing business:
24 (1) by the retailer making the sale, the cost of doing business by
25 the retailer shall be presumed to be the following percent of the
26 basic cost of cigarettes to the retailer:
27 (A) Until January 1, 2018, twelve percent (12%).
28 (B) During 2018, twelve and twenty-five hundredths percent
29 (12.25%).
30 (C) During 2019, twelve and five tenths percent (12.5%).
31 (D) During 2020, twelve and seventy-five hundredths percent
32 (12.75%).
33 (E) During 2021, thirteen percent (13%).
34 (F) During 2022, thirteen and twenty-five hundredths percent
35 (13.25%).
36 (G) During 2023, thirteen and five tenths percent (13.5%).
37 (H) During 2024, thirteen and seventy-five hundredths percent
38 (13.75%).
39 (I) After 2024, fourteen percent (14%).
40 (2) by the retailer, who in connection with the retailer's purchase
41 receives not only the discounts ordinarily allowed upon purchases
42 by a retailer, but also, in whole or in part, the discounts ordinarily
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

19
1 allowed upon purchases by a distributor, shall be presumed to be
2 the following percent of the sum of the basic cost of cigarettes
3 plus the cost of doing business by the distributor:
4 (A) Until January 1, 2018, twelve percent (12%).
5 (B) During 2018, twelve and twenty-five hundredths percent
6 (12.25%).
7 (C) During 2019, twelve and five tenths percent (12.5%).
8 (D) During 2020, twelve and seventy-five hundredths percent
9 (12.75%).
10 (E) During 2021, thirteen percent (13%).
11 (F) During 2022, thirteen and twenty-five hundredths percent
12 (13.25%).
13 (G) During 2023, thirteen and five tenths percent (13.5%).
14 (H) During 2024, thirteen and seventy-five hundredths percent
15 (13.75%).
16 (I) After 2024, fourteen percent (14%).
17 (j) "Cost to the distributor" shall mean the basic cost of cigarettes to
18 the distributor, plus the cost of doing business by the distributor as
19 evidenced by the standards and methods of accounting regularly
20 employed by him in his allocation of overhead costs and expenses, paid
21 or incurred, and must include without limitation labor costs (including
22 salaries of executives and officers), rent, depreciation, selling costs,
23 maintenance of equipment, delivery costs, all types of licenses, taxes,
24 insurance, and advertising. In the absence of proof of a lesser or higher
25 cost of doing business by the distributor making the sale, the cost of
26 doing business by the wholesaler shall be presumed to be four percent
27 (4%) of the basic cost of cigarettes to the distributor, plus cartage to the
28 retail outlet, if performed or paid for by the distributor, which cartage
29 cost, in the absence of proof of a lesser or higher cost, shall be deemed
30 to be one-half of one percent (0.5%) of the basic cost of cigarettes to
31 the distributor.
32 (k) "Registration certificate" refers to the registration certificate
33 issued to cigarette distributors by the department of state revenue under
34 IC 6-7-1-16.
35 (l) "Buydown" means any payment or compensation given by
36 a cigarette manufacturer to a cigarette distributor or retailer to
37 promote the sale of cigarettes and for which the manufacturer
38 requires that either:
39 (1) the distributor pass the resulting price reduction on to the
40 retailer; or
41 (2) the retailer pass the resulting price reduction on to the
42 consumer.
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

20
1 SECTION 39. IC 24-3-2-9 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
2 FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) In determining
3 cost to the retailer and cost to the distributor, the court or the
4 department, as the case may be, shall receive and consider as bearing
5 on the bona fides of such cost evidence tending to show that any person
6 complained against under any of the provisions of this chapter
7 purchased cigarettes with respect to the sale of which complaint is
8 made at a fictitious price, or upon terms, or in such manner, or under
9 such invoices, as to conceal the true cost, discounts, or terms of
10 purchase, and shall also receive and consider as bearing on the bona
11 fides of such cost evidence of the normal, customary, and prevailing
12 terms and discounts in connection with other sales of a similar nature
13 in the trade area or state.
14 (b) Merchandise given gratis or payment made to a retailer or
15 distributor for display, or advertising, or promotion purposes, or
16 otherwise shall not be considered in determining the cost of cigarettes
17 to the retailer or distributor.
18 (c) A buydown must be considered in determining the cost to the
19 retailer or the cost to the distributor, as applicable, provided that
20 the sum of any buydown and consideration paid by the purchaser
21 is not below the cost to the retailer or distributor.
22 SECTION 40. IC 35-45-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
23 SECTION 240, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
24 [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The definitions in this section
25 apply throughout this chapter.
26 (b) "Documentary material" means any document, drawing,
27 photograph, recording, or other tangible item containing compiled data
28 from which information can be either obtained or translated into a
29 usable form.
30 (c) "Enterprise" means:
31 (1) a sole proprietorship, corporation, limited liability company,
32 partnership, business trust, or governmental entity; or
33 (2) a union, an association, or a group, whether a legal entity or
34 merely associated in fact.
35 (d) "Pattern of racketeering activity" means engaging in at least two
36 (2) incidents of racketeering activity that have the same or similar
37 intent, result, accomplice, victim, or method of commission, or that are
38 otherwise interrelated by distinguishing characteristics that are not
39 isolated incidents. However, the incidents are a pattern of racketeering
40 activity only if at least one (1) of the incidents occurred after August
41 31, 1980, and if the last of the incidents occurred within five (5) years
42 after a prior incident of racketeering activity.
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

21
1 (e) "Racketeering activity" means to commit, to attempt to commit,
2 to conspire to commit a violation of, or aiding and abetting in a
3 violation of any of the following:
4 (1) A provision of IC 23-19, or of a rule or order issued under
5 IC 23-19.
6 (2) A violation of IC 35-45-9.
7 (3) A violation of IC 35-47.
8 (4) A violation of IC 35-49-3.
9 (5) Murder (IC 35-42-1-1).
10 (6) Battery as a Class C felony before July 1, 2014, or a Level 5
11 felony after June 30, 2014 (IC 35-42-2-1).
12 (7) Kidnapping (IC 35-42-3-2).
13 (8) Human and sexual trafficking crimes (IC 35-42-3.5).
14 (9) Child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4).
15 (10) Robbery (IC 35-42-5-1).
16 (11) Carjacking (IC 35-42-5-2) (before its repeal).
17 (12) Arson (IC 35-43-1-1).
18 (13) Burglary (IC 35-43-2-1).
19 (14) Theft (IC 35-43-4-2).
20 (15) Receiving stolen property (IC 35-43-4-2) (before its
21 amendment on July 1, 2018).
22 (16) Forgery (IC 35-43-5-2).
23 (17) An offense under IC 35-43-5.
24 (18) Bribery (IC 35-44.1-1-2).
25 (19) Official misconduct (IC 35-44.1-1-1).
26 (20) Conflict of interest (IC 35-44.1-1-4).
27 (21) Perjury (IC 35-44.1-2-1).
28 (22) Obstruction of justice (IC 35-44.1-2-2).
29 (23) Intimidation (IC 35-45-2-1).
30 (24) Promoting prostitution (IC 35-45-4-4).
31 (25) Professional gambling (IC 35-45-5-3).
32 (26) Maintaining a professional gambling site
33 (IC 35-45-5-3.5(b)).
34 (27) Promoting professional gambling (IC 35-45-5-4).
35 (28) Dealing in or manufacturing cocaine or a narcotic drug
36 (IC 35-48-4-1).
37 (29) Dealing in methamphetamine (IC 35-48-4-1.1).
38 (30) Manufacturing methamphetamine (IC 35-48-4-1.2).
39 (31) Dealing in a schedule I, II, or III controlled substance
40 (IC 35-48-4-2).
41 (32) Dealing in a schedule IV controlled substance
42 (IC 35-48-4-3).
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

22
1 (33) Dealing in a schedule V controlled substance (IC 35-48-4-4).
2 (34) Dealing in marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia
3 (IC 35-48-4-10).
4 (35) Money laundering (IC 35-45-15-5).
5 (36) A violation of IC 35-47.5-5.
6 (37) A violation of any of the following:
7 (A) IC 23-14-48-9.
8 (B) IC 30-2-9-7(b).
9 (C) IC 30-2-10-9(b).
10 (D) IC 30-2-13-38(f).
11 (38) Practice of law by a person who is not an attorney
12 (IC 33-43-2-1).
13 (39) An offense listed in IC 35-48-4 involving the manufacture or
14 sale of a synthetic drug (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-321), a
15 synthetic drug lookalike substance (as defined in
16 IC 35-31.5-2-321.5 (before its repeal on July 1, 2019)) under
17 IC 35-48-4-10.5 (before its repeal on July 1, 2019), a controlled
18 substance analog (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-8), or a substance
19 represented to be a controlled substance (as described in
20 IC 35-48-4-4.6).
21 (40) Dealing in a controlled substance resulting in death
22 (IC 35-42-1-1.5).
23 (41) Organized retail theft (IC 35-43-4-2.2).
24 (42) Sale of alcohol without a permit (IC 7.1-5-10-5).
25 SECTION 41. IC 35-46-1-10.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.163-2025,
26 SECTION 63, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
27 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.2. (a) A person may not be charged with a
28 violation under this section and a violation under IC 7.1-7-6-5.
29 (b) A retail establishment that sells or distributes a tobacco product
30 to a person less than twenty-one (21) years of age commits a Class C
31 infraction. For a sale to take place under this section, the buyer must
32 pay the retail establishment for the tobacco product.
33 (c) Notwithstanding IC 34-28-5-4(c), a civil judgment for an
34 infraction committed under this section must be imposed as follows:
35 (1) If the retail establishment at that specific business location has
36 not been issued a citation or summons for a violation of this
37 section in the previous one (1) year, a civil penalty of up to four
38 hundred dollars ($400).
39 (2) If the retail establishment at that specific business location has
40 had one (1) citation or summons issued for a violation of this
41 section in the previous one (1) year, a civil penalty of up to eight
42 hundred dollars ($800).
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

23
1 (3) If the retail establishment at that specific business location has
2 had two (2) citations or summonses issued for a violation of this
3 section in the previous one (1) year, a civil penalty of up to one
4 thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400).
5 (4) If the retail establishment at that specific business location has
6 had three (3) or more citations or summonses issued for a
7 violation of this section in the previous one (1) year, a civil
8 penalty of up to two thousand dollars ($2,000).
9 A retail establishment may not be issued a citation or summons for a
10 violation of this section more than once every twenty-four (24) hours
11 for each specific business location.
12 (d) It is not a defense that the person to whom the tobacco product
13 was sold or distributed did not smoke, chew, inhale, or otherwise
14 consume the tobacco product.
15 (e) The following defenses are available to a retail establishment
16 accused of selling or distributing a tobacco product to a person who is
17 less than twenty-one (21) years of age:
18 (1) The buyer or recipient produced a driver's license bearing the
19 purchaser's or recipient's photograph showing that the purchaser
20 or recipient was of legal age to make the purchase.
21 (2) The buyer or recipient produced a photographic identification
22 card issued under IC 9-24-16-1 or a similar card issued under the
23 laws of another state or the federal government showing that the
24 purchaser or recipient was of legal age to make the purchase.
25 (3) The appearance of the purchaser or recipient was such that an
26 ordinary prudent person would believe that the purchaser or
27 recipient was not less than thirty (30) years of age.
28 (f) It is a defense that the accused retail establishment sold or
29 delivered the tobacco product to a person who acted in the ordinary
30 course of employment or a business concerning tobacco products for
31 the following activities:
32 (1) Agriculture.
33 (2) Processing.
34 (3) Transporting.
35 (4) Wholesaling.
36 (5) Retailing.
37 (g) As used in this section, "distribute" means to give a tobacco
38 product to another person as a means of promoting, advertising, or
39 marketing the tobacco product to the general public.
40 (h) Unless a person buys or receives a tobacco product under the
41 direction of a law enforcement officer as part of an enforcement action,
42 a retail establishment that sells or distributes a tobacco product is not
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

24
1 liable for a violation of this section unless the person less than
2 twenty-one (21) years of age who bought or received the tobacco
3 product is issued a citation or summons under section 10.5 of this
4 chapter.
5 (i) Notwithstanding IC 34-28-5-5(c), civil penalties collected under
6 this section must be deposited in the Richard D. Doyle tobacco
7 education and enforcement fund (IC 7.1-6-2-6).
8 (j) A person who violates subsection (b) at least six (6) three (3)
9 times in any one (1) year commits habitual illegal sale of tobacco, a
10 Class B infraction.
11 SECTION 42. IC 35-46-1-11.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.163-2025,
12 SECTION 66, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
13 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.7. (a) A retail establishment in which tobacco
14 products account for at least eighty-five percent (85%) of the retail
15 establishment's gross sales may not allow an individual who is less than
16 twenty-one (21) years of age to enter the retail establishment.
17 (b) An individual who is less than twenty-one (21) years of age may
18 not enter a retail establishment described in subsection (a).
19 (c) A retail establishment described in subsection (a) must
20 conspicuously post on all entrances to the retail establishment the
21 following:
22 (1) A sign in boldface type that states "NOTICE: It is unlawful for
23 a person less than 21 years old to enter this store.".
24 (2) A sign printed in letters and numbers at least one-half (1/2)
25 inch high that displays a toll free phone number for assistance to
26 callers in quitting smoking, as determined by the Indiana
27 department of health.
28 (d) A person who violates this section commits a Class C infraction.
29 Notwithstanding IC 34-28-5-4(c), a civil judgment for an infraction
30 committed under this section must be imposed as follows:
31 (1) If the person has not been cited for a violation of this section
32 in the previous one (1) year, a civil penalty of up to four hundred
33 dollars ($400).
34 (2) If the person has had one (1) violation in the previous one (1)
35 year, a civil penalty of up to eight hundred dollars ($800).
36 (3) If the person has had two (2) violations in the previous one (1)
37 year, a civil penalty of up to one thousand four hundred dollars
38 ($1,400).
39 (4) If the person has had three (3) or more violations in the
40 previous one (1) year, a civil penalty of up to two thousand dollars
41 ($2,000).
42 A person may not be cited more than once every twenty-four (24)
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

25
1 hours.
2 (e) Notwithstanding IC 34-28-5-5(c), civil penalties collected under
3 this section must be deposited in the Richard D. Doyle tobacco
4 education and enforcement fund established under IC 7.1-6-2-6.
5 (f) A person who violates subsection (a) at least six (6) three (3)
6 times in any one (1) year period commits habitual illegal entrance by
7 a minor, a Class B infraction.
8 SECTION 43. IC 35-46-6-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.163-2025,
9 SECTION 68, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
10 JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A person who knowingly or intentionally
11 uses or distributes nitrous oxide with intent to cause a condition of
12 intoxication, euphoria, excitement, exhilaration, stupefaction, or
13 dulling of the senses of another person, unless the nitrous oxide is to be
14 used for medical purposes, commits a Class B misdemeanor. However,
15 the offense is a Class A misdemeanor if the person has a prior
16 unrelated conviction under this section.
17 (b) Except as provided in subsection (c), a person who knowingly
18 or intentionally sells, uses, or distributes flavored nitrous oxide
19 commits a Class B misdemeanor. However, the offense is a Class A
20 misdemeanor if the person has a prior unrelated conviction under this
21 section.
22 (c) The prohibition on the sale, use, or distribution of flavored
23 nitrous oxide in subsection (b) does not apply to:
24 (1) a retail or wholesale restaurant supply company that sells or
25 distributes flavored nitrous oxide to a person for use in food and
26 beverage preparation or other culinary purposes; or
27 (2) a person that uses flavored nitrous oxide in food and beverage
28 recipes or for other legitimate culinary purposes; or
29 (3) a law enforcement agency that is disposing of flavored
30 nitrous oxide by donation to a nonprofit organization.
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

26
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Public Policy, to which
was referred Senate Bill No. 185, has had the same under consideration
and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with the
recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 1, between the enacting clause and line 1, begin a new
paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 7.1-3-3-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.163-2025,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) The holder of a beer wholesaler's permit
may purchase and import from the primary source of supply, possess,
and sell at wholesale, beer and flavored malt beverages manufactured
within or without this state.
(b) A beer wholesaler permittee may possess, transport, sell, and
deliver beer to:
(1) another beer wholesaler authorized by the brewer to sell the
brand purchased;
(2) an employee; and
(3) a holder of a beer retailer's permit, beer dealer's permit,
temporary beer permit, dining car permit, boat permit, airplane
permit, or supplemental caterer's permit; and
(4) a food manufacturer that is registered with the federal
Food and Drug Administration, for the purpose of adding or
integrating the beer into a product or recipe;
located within this state. The sale, transportation, and delivery of beer
shall be made only from inventory that has been located on the
wholesaler's premises before the time of invoicing and delivery.
(c) The beer wholesaler's bona fide regular employees may purchase
beer from the wholesaler in:
(1) bottles, cans, or any other type of permissible containers in an
amount not to exceed forty-eight (48) pints; or
(2) one (1) keg;
at any one (1) time.
(d) The importation, transportation, possession, sale, and delivery
of beer shall be subject to the rules of the commission and subject to
the same restrictions provided in this title for a person holding a
brewer's permit.
(e) The holder of a beer wholesaler's permit may purchase, import,
possess, transport, sell, and deliver any commodity listed in
IC 7.1-3-10-5, unless prohibited by this title. However, a beer
wholesaler may deliver flavored malt beverages only to the holder of
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

27
one (1) of the following permits:
(1) A beer wholesaler or wine wholesaler permit, if the wholesaler
is authorized by the primary source of supply to sell the brand of
flavored malt beverage purchased.
(2) A wine retailer's permit, wine dealer's permit, temporary wine
permit, dining car wine permit, boat permit, airplane permit, or
supplemental caterer's permit.
(f) A beer wholesaler may:
(1) store beer for an out-of-state brewer described in IC 7.1-3-2-9
and deliver the stored beer to another beer wholesaler that the
out-of-state brewer authorizes to sell the beer;
(2) perform all necessary accounting and auditing functions
associated with the services described in subdivision (1); and
(3) receive a fee from an out-of-state brewer for the services
described in subdivisions (1) through (2).
(g) A beer wholesaler may sell, donate, transport, and deliver beer
to a qualified organization for:
(1) an allowable event under IC 7.1-3-6.1;
(2) a charity auction under IC 7.1-3-6.2; or
(3) an event under IC 7.1-3-6.3;
located within this state. The sale, donation to a qualified organization,
transportation, and delivery of beer shall be made only from inventory
that has been located on the wholesaler's premises before the time of
invoicing and delivery.".
Page 1, between lines 13 and 14, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 2. IC 7.1-3-18.5-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) A person may not sell
tobacco products or electronic cigarettes at wholesale or
participate in the wholesale distribution of tobacco products or
electronic cigarettes without a valid wholesale tobacco sales
certificate issued by the commission.
(b) The commission may only issue a wholesale tobacco sales
certificate to a person who owns or operates at a premises
consisting of a permanent building or structure that is used for the
wholesale distribution of tobacco products or electronic
cigarettes.".
Page 5, delete lines 38 through 42, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"SECTION 8. IC 7.1-7-1-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. (a) An e-liquid product manufactured,
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

28
distributed, or sold in Indiana must adhere to all applicable rules
and regulations of the federal Food and Drug Administration,
including those rules and regulations regarding product safety,
labeling, and manufacturing standards.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this article, this article does
not require a product subject to this article to be specifically
approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration if the
product satisfies all applicable rules and regulations.
(c) If a product subject to this article is approved by the federal
Food and Drug Administration, the approval constitutes prima
facie evidence of compliance with this article.
SECTION 9. IC 7.1-7-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), this
article applies to the following:
(1) The commercial manufacturing, bottling, selling, bartering, or
importing of e-liquid in Indiana.
(2) The sale, possession, and use of e-liquid products in Indiana,
including through a cigarette vending machine.
(b) This article does not apply applies to a manufacturer
manufacturers of a both closed and open system vapor product,
except as specifically provided in this article. devices manufactured
or sold in Indiana.
SECTION 10. IC 7.1-7-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The purpose of this article is to protect public
health and safety by:
(1) ensuring the safety and security of e-liquid manufactured for
sale in Indiana;
(2) ensuring that e-liquid manufactured or sold in Indiana
conforms to appropriate standards of identity, strength, quality,
and purity; and
(3) ensuring that e-liquid is not contaminated or adulterated by
the inclusion of ingredients or other substances that might pose
unreasonable threats to public health and safety; and
(4) ensuring dangerous foreign adversary products are not
sold or distributed in Indiana.
SECTION 11. IC 7.1-7-2-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 8. "Distributor" means a person who is licensed under
IC 6-7-2-8 that:
(1) distributes, sells, barters, or exchanges e-liquid in Indiana to
retail dealers for the purpose of resale; or
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

29
(2) purchases e-liquid directly from a manufacturer for the
purpose of resale.
SECTION 12. IC 7.1-7-2-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. "E-liquid" means a substance that:
(1) may or may not contain nicotine; and
(2) is intended to be vaporized and inhaled using a vapor product.
device.
SECTION 13. IC 7.1-7-2-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. "Flavoring" means a food grade additive or
synthetic flavoring substance that is used to add flavor and that is not
prohibited by the federal Food and Drug Administration as an additive
in vapor products. devices.
SECTION 13. IC 7.1-7-2-12.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.3. "Foreign adversary" means
an individual, business entity, or other entity located in or
organized under the laws of a nation governed by a foreign
government listed in 15 CFR 791.4.
SECTION 14. IC 7.1-7-2-12.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.5. "Foreign adversary
product" means:
(1) an e-liquid; or
(2) an e-liquid containing an ingredient;
that is manufactured, sourced, or otherwise imported from a
nation governed by a foreign government listed in 15 CFR 791.4.
SECTION 15. IC 7.1-7-2-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. "Manufacturer" means a person located inside
or outside Indiana that is engaged in manufacturing e-liquid for closed
and open system vapor devices.
SECTION 16. IC 7.1-7-2-15.5 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 15.5. "Manufacturer of a closed system vapor product"
means a manufacturer of vapor products whose closed system vapor
products are for sale in Indiana, but that does not produce open system
vapor products that are for sale in Indiana.
SECTION 17. IC 7.1-7-2-23, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. "Vapor product" device" means a powered
vaporizer that converts e-liquid to a vapor intended for inhalation. The
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

30
term includes both open and closed system vapor devices.
SECTION 18. IC 7.1-7-2-24 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 24. "Wholesaler" means a person who has obtained
or is required to obtain a wholesale tobacco sales certificate under
IC 7.1-3-18.5-1.5 that:
(1) distributes, sells, barters, or exchanges e-liquid in Indiana
to retail dealers for the purpose of resale; or
(2) purchases e-liquid directly from a manufacturer for the
purpose of resale to resellers.
SECTION 19. IC 7.1-7-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The commission has the following duties and
responsibilities:
(1) To require the submission of information necessary to
implement this article.
(2) To issue permits.
(3) To charge fees as set forth in this article. The fees charged
under this subdivision may not exceed the actual costs incurred by
the commission.
(4) To approve or deny a permit application made under
IC 7.1-7-4 within sixty (60) days of receiving the application.
SECTION 20. IC 7.1-7-4-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2020,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Not later than January 1, 2027, a
manufacturer of an e-liquid product that is manufactured or sold
in Indiana must obtain a permit under this section.
(a) (b) A manufacturer of e-liquid may not mix, bottle, package, or
sell e-liquid to retailers, consumers, or distributors wholesalers in
Indiana without a permit issued by the commission under this article.
(b) An e-liquid manufactured by an e-liquids manufacturer
approved by the commission under this article before July 1, 2017, may
be distributed and sold for retail until the expiration date of the
e-liquid.
(c) A manufacturing permit issued by the commission before July
1, 2026, is valid for five (5) years. A manufacturing permit issued by
the commission after June 30, 2026, is valid for two (2) years. A
manufacturing permit issued by the commission under this article
before July 1, 2017, does not expire before July 1, 2020.
(d) An initial application for a manufacturing permit must include
the following:
(1) The name, telephone number, and address of the applicant.
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

31
(2) The name, telephone number, and address of the
manufacturing facility.
(3) The name, telephone number, title, and address of the person
responsible for the manufacturing facility.
(4) Verification that the facility will comply with applicable
tobacco products good manufacturing practices promulgated
under 21 U.S.C. 387f(e) of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic
Act.
(5) Verification that the manufacturer will comply with the
applicable ingredient listing required by 21 U.S.C. 387d(a)(1) of
the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.
(6) Written consent allowing the state police department to
conduct a state or national criminal history background check on
any person listed on the application.
(7) A nonrefundable initial application fee of one thousand dollars
($1,000). three thousand dollars ($3,000).
(8) Verification that the manufacturer will comply with all
other state and federal laws related to e-liquids.
(9) An affirmation, made under the penalties for perjury, that
the manufacturer will not use any ingredients or e-liquids in
the manufacturer's manufacturing process that originate in
a nation governed by a foreign government listed in 15 CFR
791.4.
(e) The fees collected under subsection (d)(7) shall be deposited in
the enforcement and administration fund established under IC 7.1-4-10.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in this article, an applicant for
a permit under this section must adhere to all state and federal
laws applicable to e-liquids, including rules and regulations
promulgated by the federal Food and Drug Administration.
SECTION 21. IC 7.1-7-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A manufacturing permit that is renewed by
the commission before July 1, 2026, is valid for five (5) years. A
manufacturing permit that is renewed by the commission after
June 30, 2026, is valid for two (2) years.
(b) A renewal application for a manufacturing permit must include
the following:
(1) The name, telephone number, and address of the applicant.
(2) The name, telephone number, and address of the
manufacturing facility.
(3) The name, telephone number, title, and address of the person
responsible for the manufacturing facility.
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

32
(4) Verification that the facility complies with all tobacco
products good manufacturing practices:
(A) set forth in; and
(B) promulgated in federal rules under;
21 U.S.C. 387f through 21 U.S.C. 387u of the federal Food, Drug,
and Cosmetic Act.
(5) Written consent allowing the state police department to
conduct a state or national criminal history background check on
any person listed on the application.
(6) A nonrefundable renewal application fee of five hundred
dollars ($500). one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(7) Verification that the manufacturer will comply with all
other state and federal laws related to e-liquids.
(8) An affirmation, made under the penalties for perjury, that
the manufacturer will not use any ingredients or e-liquids in
the manufacturer's manufacturing process that originate in
a nation governed by a foreign government listed in 15 CFR
791.4.
(c) The fees collected under subsection (b)(6) shall be deposited in
the enforcement and administration fund established under IC 7.1-4-10.
SECTION 22. IC 7.1-7-4-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.17-2019,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) As used in this section:
(1) "adulterated" means a product that:
(A) consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or
decomposed substance; or
(B) is contaminated by any added poisonous or added
deleterious substance that may render the product injurious to
health; and or
(C) is a foreign adversary product (as defined in
IC 7.1-7-2-12.5); and
(2) "tamper evident package" means a package having at least one
(1) indicator or barrier to entry that, if breached or missing, can
reasonably be expected to provide visible evidence to consumers
that tampering has occurred.
(b) A manufacturing facility shall comply with the following
requirements:
(1) An e-liquid container must use a child proof cap that has the
child resistant effectiveness set forth in the federal poison
prevention packaging standards, 16 CFR 1700.15(b)(1).
(2) An e-liquid container must use a tamper evident package. The
tamper evident package feature must be designed to and remain
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

33
intact when handled in a reasonable manner during the
manufacture, distribution, and retail display of the e-liquid
container.
(3) The label on an e-liquid container must meet the nicotine
addictiveness warning statement requirements set forth in 21 CFR
1143.3.
(4) The manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer may not add an
adulterated product to any e-liquid produced for sale in Indiana.
(5) The manufacturer must submit to random site visits by the
commission.
(6) The manufacturer may:
(A) own and control both the e-liquid manufacturing process
and the bottling process; or
(B) subcontract with another manufacturer for the performance
of the e-liquid manufacturing service, the bottling services, or
both services.
However, both the manufacturer performing a service under
clause (B) and the manufacturer for which the service is
performed must meet the requirements of this article, including
obtaining a permit. A manufacturer may not be located in or
source any ingredient or substance used in an e-liquid product
from a nation governed by a foreign government listed in 15
CFR 791.4.
(7) A manufacturer may use a flavoring, as defined by
IC 7.1-7-2-12, as an ingredient in an e-liquid.
(8) The manufacturer or any person listed on the permit
application may not have been convicted within ten (10) years
before the date of application of:
(A) a federal crime having a sentence of at least one (1) year;
(B) an Indiana Class A, Class B, or Class C felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3,
Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014);
(C) a crime in a state other than Indiana having a penalty equal
to the penalty for an Indiana Class A, Class B, or Class C
felony (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level
1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014);
(D) an Indiana Class D felony involving a controlled substance
under IC 35-48-4 (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014)
or a Level 6 felony involving a controlled substance under
IC 35-48-4 (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014); or
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

34
(E) a crime in a state other than Indiana similar to a Class D
felony involving a controlled substance under IC 35-48-4 (for
a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 6 felony
involving a controlled substance under IC 35-48-4 (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014).
SECTION 23. IC 7.1-7-4-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) This section does not apply to:
(1) a vapor device (as defined in IC 7.1-7-2-23), including:
(A) a part to be utilized in an open or closed system to
convert e-liquid to a vapor for inhalation; or
(B) an e-liquid product that includes a vapor device
sourced from or manufactured by a foreign adversary; and
(2) an e-liquid product that is manufactured by or sourced
from a foreign adversary, if the e-liquid product has been
specifically approved for distribution and sale in the United
States by the federal Food and Drug Administration.
(b) A manufacturer of e-liquid that is permitted or required to
be permitted under this chapter may not manufacture or source a
foreign adversary product.
(c) A retailer that holds or is required to hold a tobacco sales
certificate under IC 7.1-3-18.5-1 may not possess, sell, or otherwise
distribute a foreign adversary product.
(d) A wholesaler that holds or is required to hold a wholesale
tobacco sales certificate under IC 7.1-3-18.5-1.5 may not possess,
sell, or otherwise distribute a foreign adversary product.
SECTION 24. IC 7.1-7-5-1.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.220-2023,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.1. (a) A retailer must have a valid sales
certificate issued by the commission in accordance with
IC 7.1-3-18.5-1 that contains a separate box to check for identifying a
retailer that sells e-liquids.
(b) A retailer may purchase e-liquid only from an Indiana e-liquid
manufacturing permit holder or an Indiana distributor wholesaler
permit holder.
(c) A retailer shall retain all invoices for e-liquid that the retailer
purchases for two (2) years.
(d) A retailer shall not allow the self-service sale for individuals
purchasing an e-liquid.
(e) A retailer may not sell an e-liquid that contains more than
seventy-five (75) milligrams per milliliter of nicotine.
(f) A manufacturer must have an e-liquid manufacturing permit
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

35
issued under IC 7.1-7-4.
(g) A distributor wholesaler that does not have a valid e-liquid
manufacturing permit issued under IC 7.1-7-4 must have a valid
distributor's license wholesale tobacco sales certificate issued under
IC 6-7-2-8. IC 7.1-3-18.5-1.5.
(h) A distributor wholesaler shall purchase and distribute e-liquid
from an:
(1) Indiana e-liquid manufacturer that has a valid e-liquid
manufacturing permit under IC 7.1-7-4; or
(2) Indiana e-liquid distributor wholesaler that has a valid:
(A) e-liquid manufacturing permit issued under IC 7.1-7-4; or
(B) distributor's license wholesale tobacco sales certificate
under IC 6-7-2-8. IC 7.1-3-18.5-1.5.
(i) A distributor wholesaler shall retain all invoices to a retailer or
from a manufacturer for at least two (2) years.
(j) A manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, or retailer may not
market e-liquid as a modified risk tobacco product, as defined by
IC 7.1-7-2-17.5, that has not been designated as a modified risk
tobacco product by the federal Food and Drug Administration.
(k) Except as provided in subsection (m), a manufacturer including
a manufacturer of a closed system vapor product, permitted or
required to be permitted under IC 7.1-7-4 shall annually submit a
report to the commission setting forth:
(1) each new product that the manufacturer is producing and is
sold in Indiana with a list of the contents and ingredients by
volume; and
(2) whether the manufacturer has stopped producing products
previously produced and sold in Indiana.
A report under this subsection is confidential, and the commission may
not disclose it to another person.
(l) A manufacturer permitted or required to be permitted under
IC 7.1-7-4 shall annually submit a report to the commission setting
forth:
(1) the milligrams per milliliter of nicotine in each product the
manufacturer produces; and
(2) the milliliters of each product sold that current year.
A report under this subsection is confidential, and the ATC may not
disclose it to another person.
(m) A manufacturer is not required to submit a report described in
subsection (k) if the manufacturer submits to the commission a
certification, by October 1 of each year, that each of the manufacturer's
vapor products devices sold in Indiana has been filed with the federal
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

36
Food and Drug Administration.
SECTION 25. IC 7.1-7-5-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.176-2015,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A manufacturer of e-liquid may file a
request with the Indiana department of health for approval of an
ingredient to be allowed in the composition of e-liquid.
(b) The Indiana department of health may approve the request filed
under subsection (a) if the department determines that the ingredient
will not pose an unreasonable threat to public health and safety.
SECTION 26. IC 7.1-7-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
SECTION 31, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) If a manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler,
or retailer violates any provision of this article, the manufacturer,
distributor, wholesaler, or retailer may be reprimanded, assessed a
civil penalty, or have the manufacturer's permit, distributor's license,
wholesaler's tobacco sales certificate, or retailer's tobacco sales
certificate suspended by the commission.
(b) Any provision in this article that requires a manufacturer,
wholesaler, or retailer to comply with the federal Food, Drug, and
Cosmetic Act or a federal rule promulgated under the federal Food,
Drug, and Cosmetic Act is under the sole dual jurisdiction of the
federal Food and Drug Administration and the commission and may
be enforced through action by the federal Food and Drug
Administration and the commission. If the federal Food and Drug
Administration seeks court enforcement of any section of the federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act cited in this article and a civil monetary
penalty is assessed against the manufacturer, the act or omission for
which the penalty was assessed constitutes a violation of this article
and may result in a reprimand or civil penalty or a revocation by
the commission of the license or sales certificate of the
manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer.
(c) The commission may assess a civil penalty against a
manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, or retailer for a violation of this
article in an amount that does not exceed ten thousand dollars
($10,000). A civil penalty may be assessed in addition to other
penalties allowed under this article.
(d) The commission has full authority to enforce all provisions
of this article, including those that require compliance with federal
law.
SECTION 27. IC 24-3-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.217-2017,
SECTION 154, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. Unless the context in this chapter
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

37
requires otherwise, the term:
(a) "Cigarette" shall mean and include any roll for smoking made
wholly or in part of tobacco, irrespective of size or shape and
irrespective of tobacco being flavored, adulterated, or mixed with any
other ingredient, where such roll has a wrapper or cover made of paper
or any other material; provided the definition in this paragraph shall not
be construed to include cigars.
(b) "Person" or the term "company", used in this chapter
interchangeably, means and includes any individual, assignee, receiver,
commissioner, fiduciary, trustee, executor, administrator, institution,
bank, consignee, firm, partnership, limited liability company, joint
vendor, pool, syndicate, bureau, association, cooperative association,
society, club, fraternity, sorority, lodge, corporation, municipal
corporation, or other political subdivision of the state engaged in
private or proprietary activities or business, estate, trust, or any other
group or combination acting as a unit, and the plural as well as the
singular number, unless the intention to give a more limited meaning
is disclosed by the context.
(c) "Distributor" shall mean and include every person who sells,
barters, exchanges, or distributes cigarettes in the state of Indiana to
retail dealers for the purpose of resale, or who purchases for resale
cigarettes from a manufacturer of cigarettes or from a wholesaler,
jobber, or distributor outside the state of Indiana who is not a
distributor holding a registration certificate issued under the provisions
of IC 6-7-1.
(d) "Retailer" shall mean every person, other than a distributor, who
purchases, sells, offers for sale, or distributes cigarettes to consumers
or to any person for any purpose other than resale, irrespective of
quantity or amount or the number of sales.
(e) "Sell at retail", "sale at retail", and "retail sales" shall mean and
include any transfer of title to cigarettes for a valuable consideration
made in the ordinary course of trade or usual conduct of the seller's
business to the purchaser for consummation or use.
(f) "Sell at wholesale", "sale at wholesale", and "wholesale sales"
shall mean and include any transfer of title to cigarettes for a valuable
consideration made in the ordinary course of trade or usual conduct of
a distributor's business.
(g) "Basic cost of cigarettes" shall mean the invoice cost of
cigarettes to the retailer or distributor, as the case may be, or the
replacement cost of cigarettes to the retailer or distributor, as the case
may be, within thirty (30) days prior to the date of sale, in the quantity
last purchased, whichever is the lower, less all trade discounts and
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

38
customary discounts for cash, plus the cost at full face value of any
stamps which may be required by IC 6-7-1, if not included by the
manufacturer in his selling price to the distributor.
(h) "Department" shall mean the alcohol and tobacco commission
or its duly authorized assistants and employees.
(i) "Cost to the retailer" shall mean the basic cost of cigarettes to the
retailer, plus the cost of doing business by the retailer as evidenced by
the standards and methods of accounting regularly employed by him in
his allocation of overhead costs and expenses paid or incurred and must
include without limitation labor (including salaries of executives and
officers), rent, depreciation, selling costs, maintenance of equipment,
delivery costs, all types of licenses, taxes, insurance, and advertising;
however, any retailer who, in connection with the retailer's purchase,
receives not only the discounts ordinarily allowed upon purchases by
a retailer, but also, in whole or in part, discounts ordinarily allowed on
purchases by a distributor shall, in determining costs to the retailer
pursuant to this section, add the cost to the distributor, as defined in
paragraph (j), to the basic cost of cigarettes to said retailer as well as
the cost of doing business by the retailer. In the absence of proof of a
lesser or higher cost of doing business:
(1) by the retailer making the sale, the cost of doing business by
the retailer shall be presumed to be the following percent of the
basic cost of cigarettes to the retailer:
(A) Until January 1, 2018, twelve percent (12%).
(B) During 2018, twelve and twenty-five hundredths percent
(12.25%).
(C) During 2019, twelve and five tenths percent (12.5%).
(D) During 2020, twelve and seventy-five hundredths percent
(12.75%).
(E) During 2021, thirteen percent (13%).
(F) During 2022, thirteen and twenty-five hundredths percent
(13.25%).
(G) During 2023, thirteen and five tenths percent (13.5%).
(H) During 2024, thirteen and seventy-five hundredths percent
(13.75%).
(I) After 2024, fourteen percent (14%).
(2) by the retailer, who in connection with the retailer's purchase
receives not only the discounts ordinarily allowed upon purchases
by a retailer, but also, in whole or in part, the discounts ordinarily
allowed upon purchases by a distributor, shall be presumed to be
the following percent of the sum of the basic cost of cigarettes
plus the cost of doing business by the distributor:
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

39
(A) Until January 1, 2018, twelve percent (12%).
(B) During 2018, twelve and twenty-five hundredths percent
(12.25%).
(C) During 2019, twelve and five tenths percent (12.5%).
(D) During 2020, twelve and seventy-five hundredths percent
(12.75%).
(E) During 2021, thirteen percent (13%).
(F) During 2022, thirteen and twenty-five hundredths percent
(13.25%).
(G) During 2023, thirteen and five tenths percent (13.5%).
(H) During 2024, thirteen and seventy-five hundredths percent
(13.75%).
(I) After 2024, fourteen percent (14%).
(j) "Cost to the distributor" shall mean the basic cost of cigarettes to
the distributor, plus the cost of doing business by the distributor as
evidenced by the standards and methods of accounting regularly
employed by him in his allocation of overhead costs and expenses, paid
or incurred, and must include without limitation labor costs (including
salaries of executives and officers), rent, depreciation, selling costs,
maintenance of equipment, delivery costs, all types of licenses, taxes,
insurance, and advertising. In the absence of proof of a lesser or higher
cost of doing business by the distributor making the sale, the cost of
doing business by the wholesaler shall be presumed to be four percent
(4%) of the basic cost of cigarettes to the distributor, plus cartage to the
retail outlet, if performed or paid for by the distributor, which cartage
cost, in the absence of proof of a lesser or higher cost, shall be deemed
to be one-half of one percent (0.5%) of the basic cost of cigarettes to
the distributor.
(k) "Registration certificate" refers to the registration certificate
issued to cigarette distributors by the department of state revenue under
IC 6-7-1-16.
(l) "Buydown" means any payment or compensation given by
a cigarette manufacturer to a cigarette distributor or retailer to
promote the sale of cigarettes and for which the manufacturer
requires that either:
(1) the distributor pass the resulting price reduction on to the
retailer; or
(2) the retailer pass the resulting price reduction on to the
consumer.
SECTION 28. IC 24-3-2-9 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) In determining
cost to the retailer and cost to the distributor, the court or the
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

40
department, as the case may be, shall receive and consider as bearing
on the bona fides of such cost evidence tending to show that any person
complained against under any of the provisions of this chapter
purchased cigarettes with respect to the sale of which complaint is
made at a fictitious price, or upon terms, or in such manner, or under
such invoices, as to conceal the true cost, discounts, or terms of
purchase, and shall also receive and consider as bearing on the bona
fides of such cost evidence of the normal, customary, and prevailing
terms and discounts in connection with other sales of a similar nature
in the trade area or state.
(b) Merchandise given gratis or payment made to a retailer or
distributor for display, or advertising, or promotion purposes, or
otherwise shall not be considered in determining the cost of cigarettes
to the retailer or distributor.
(c) A buydown must be considered in determining the cost to the
retailer or the cost to the distributor, as applicable, provided that
the sum of any buydown and consideration paid by the purchaser
is not below the cost to the retailer or distributor.".
Page 6, delete lines 1 through 2.
Page 11, after line 11, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 13. An emergency is declared for this act.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass and be reassigned to the
Senate Committee on Appropriations.
(Reference is to SB 185 as introduced.)
ALTING, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 9, Nays 0.
_____
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Appropriations, to which
was referred Senate Bill No. 185, has had the same under consideration
and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with the
recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 1, delete lines 1 through 17.
Page 2, delete lines 1 through 41.
Page 25, delete line 11.
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

41
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 185 as printed January 16, 2026.)
GARTEN, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 12, Nays 1.
_____
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Public Policy, to which was
referred Senate Bill 185, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the House with the
recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 2, delete lines 8 through 42, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 3. IC 7.1-3-18.5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.107-2024,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) A person who desires a certificate must
provide the following to the commission:
(1) The applicant's name and mailing address and the address of
the premises for which the certificate is being issued.
(2) Except as provided in section 6(c) of this chapter, a fee of:
(A) two hundred dollars ($200) for a retail tobacco sales
certificate; or
(B) one hundred dollars ($100) for a wholesale tobacco
sales certificate.
(3) The name under which the applicant transacts or intends to
transact business.
(4) The address of the applicant's principal place of business or
headquarters, if any.
(5) The statement required under section 2.6 of this chapter.
(6) If the applicant is applying for a new certificate under section
3.2 of this chapter, a copy of each of the following:
(A) If the new ownership of the business is a business entity,
the articles of incorporation, articles of organization, or any
other formation documents of the business entity.
(B) If the new ownership of the business is an individual,
either:
(i) the sales or purchase agreement; or
(ii) an affidavit signed by the applicant concerning the sale
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

42
or purchase, on a form prescribed by the commission, that
includes the name and address of the seller and purchaser.
(C) The certificate held by the previous ownership of the
business.
(7) A photocopy of the owner's driver's license, identification
card issued under IC 9-24-16-1, a similar card issued under
the laws of another state or the federal government, or
another government issued document that bears the owner's
photograph and birth date. If the applicant is a business with
multiple owners, the applicant must designate at least one (1)
managing owner for whom a photocopy of the managing
owner's identification must be provided under this
subdivision.
(b) A separate certificate is required for each location where the
tobacco products or electronic cigarettes are sold or distributed. A retail
An establishment may not hold more than one (1) active tobacco sales
certificate for a retail location at any time. Except when the real estate
for a retail location is transferred to an independent third party,
the commission shall not issue a certificate to a retail location
where a tobacco sales certificate was revoked within one (1) year
prior to the date of the application.
(c) A certificate holder shall conspicuously display the holder's
certificate on the holder's premises where the tobacco products or
electronic cigarettes are sold or distributed.
(d) Any intentional misstatement or suppression of a material fact
in an application filed under this section constitutes grounds for denial
or revocation of the certificate.
(e) A certificate may be issued only to a person who meets the
following requirements:
(1) If the person is an individual, the person must be at least
twenty-one (21) years of age.
(2) The person must be authorized to do business in Indiana.
(3) The person has not had an interest in a certificate revoked or
suspended by the commission for that business location within
the preceding one (1) year.
(f) The fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the
enforcement and administration fund under IC 7.1-4-10.".
Page 3, delete lines 1 through 14.
Page 4, delete lines 21 through 42, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"SECTION 6. IC 7.1-3-18.5-9.2, AS ADDED BY P.L.107-2024,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

43
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9.2. (a) An employee of a certificate holder must
hold a valid:
(1) driver's license issued by the state of Indiana or another state;
or
(2) identification card issued by the state of Indiana, another state,
or the United States;
to sell tobacco products.
(b) An employee must have the employee's driver's license or
identification card or a copy of the employee's driver's license or
identification card:
(1) either:
(A) in the employee's possession; or
(B) on file with the employee's employer; and
(2) upon request, readily available to show to an excise officer or
law enforcement;
when selling tobacco products.
(c) If an employee holds a valid license or identification card as
described in subsection (a) but is unable to show the license,
identification card, or a copy to an excise officer under subsection (b)
because:
(1) the employee has left the license, identification card, or copy
in another location; or
(2) the license, identification card, or copy has otherwise been lost
or mislaid;
the employee may, within five (5) days of the employee's inability to
show the license, identification card, or copy to the excise officer,
produce to the excise officer or to the office of the commission
satisfactory evidence of a license or identification card issued to the
individual that was valid at the time the individual was unable to show
the license, identification card, or copy.
(d) If an employee who is unable to show a license, identification
card, or copy to an excise officer fails to produce satisfactory evidence
within five (5) days in the manner described in subsection (c), the
commission may impose a civil penalty on the certificate holder under
IC 7.1-3-23-3.
(e) The commission shall take the following actions with respect
to a certificate holder's certificate if the certificate holder's
employees violate this section:
(1) For three (3) violations in a one (1) year period, suspend
the certificate for a period of five (5) days.
(2) For four (4) violations in a one (1) year period, suspend the
certificate for a period of an additional five (5) days.
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

44
(3) For five (5) violations in a one (1) year period, suspend the
certificate for a period of an additional five (5) days.
(4) For six (6) or more violations in a one (1) year period,
revoke the certificate.".
Page 5, delete lines 1 through 32.
Page 6, delete lines 21 through 32, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"SECTION 9. IC 7.1-7-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), This
article applies to the following:
(1) The commercial manufacturing, bottling, selling, bartering, or
importing of e-liquid in Indiana.
(2) The sale, possession, and use of e-liquid products in Indiana,
including through a cigarette vending machine.
(b) This article does not apply to a manufacturer of a closed system
vapor product, except as specifically provided in this article.".
Page 7, between lines 17 and 18, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 13. IC 7.1-7-2-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. "E-liquid product" means
a vapor device that contains e-liquid, with or without nicotine.".
Page 7, line 28, delete "governed by a foreign".
Page 7, line 29, delete "government listed" and insert "listed as a
foreign adversary".
Page 7, line 37, delete "governed by a foreign government listed"
and insert "listed as a foreign adversary".
Page 8, line 16, after "e-liquid" insert "or e-liquid products".
Page 8, line 18, after "e-liquid" insert "or e-liquid products".
Page 8, line 35, after "of" insert "e-liquid or".
Page 9, line 27, after "e-liquids" delete "." and insert "and e-liquid
products.".
Page 9, line 30, delete "that originate in" and insert "from".
Page 9, line 31, delete "governed by a foreign government listed"
and insert "listed as a foreign adversary".
Page 9, line 37, after "e-liquids" delete "," and insert "and e-liquid
products,".
Page 10, line 22, after "e-liquids" delete "." and insert "and e-liquid
products.".
Page 10, line 25, delete "that originate in" and insert "from".
Page 10, line 26, delete "governed by a foreign government listed"
and insert "listed as a foreign adversary".
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

45
Page 11, line 30, after "in an" insert "e-liquid or".
Page 11, line 31, delete "governed by a foreign government listed"
and insert "listed as a foreign adversary".
Page 12, delete lines 15 through 35, begin new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 25. IC 7.1-7-4-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) This section does not apply to:
(1) a vapor device (as defined in IC 7.1-7-2-23), including a
part to be utilized in an open or closed system to convert
e-liquid to a vapor for inhalation;
(2) an e-liquid product manufactured by or sourced from a
foreign adversary; and
(3) an e-liquid product that is manufactured by or sourced
from a foreign adversary, if the e-liquid product has been
specifically approved for distribution and sale in the United
States by the federal Food and Drug Administration.
(b) A manufacturer that is permitted or required to be
permitted under this chapter may not manufacture or source a
foreign adversary product.
(c) A retailer that holds or is required to hold a tobacco sales
certificate under IC 7.1-3-18.5-1 may not possess, sell, or otherwise
distribute a foreign adversary product.
(d) A wholesaler that holds or is required to hold a wholesale
tobacco sales certificate under IC 7.1-3-18.5-1.5 may not possess,
sell, or otherwise distribute a foreign adversary product.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 185 as printed January 23, 2026.)
MANNING
Committee Vote: yeas 10, nays 0.
_____
HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that Engrossed Senate Bill 185 be amended to
read as follows:
Page 1, line 9, after "structure" delete ",".
Page 1, line 10, delete "that does not contain sleeping or living
quarters,".
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

46
Page 1, between lines 13 and 14, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(c) For purposes of subsection (b)(1), a permitted premises may
not include sleeping or living quarters.".
Page 2, line 5, after "operates" insert "a wholesale tobacco
business".
Page 3, line 23, delete "or".
Page 3, line 24, delete "suspended".
Page 3, delete lines 28 through 42.
Page 4, delete lines 1 through 33.
Page 6, line 16, after "An" insert "e-liquid or".
Page 6, delete lines 28 through 37, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"SECTION 8. IC 7.1-7-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), This
article applies to the following:
(1) The commercial manufacturing, bottling, selling, sale,
bartering, or importing, possession, and use of e-liquid and
e-liquid products in Indiana, including through a cigarette
vending machine.
(2) The sale, possession, and use of e-liquid products in Indiana.
(b) This article does not apply to a manufacturer of a closed system
vapor product, except as specifically provided in this article.".
Page 6, line 42, after "e-liquid" insert "and e-liquid products".
Page 7, line 2, after "e-liquid" insert "and e-liquid products".
Page 7, line 3, strike "conforms" and insert "conform".
Page 7, line 5, after "e-liquid" insert "and e-liquid products".
Page 7, line 5, strike "is" and insert "are".
Page 7, between lines 9 and 10, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 9. IC 7.1-7-2-6.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2020,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.3. "Delivery sale" means a sale of an e-liquid,
an e-liquid product, or a vapor device to a purchaser in Indiana in
which the purchaser submits the order for the sale:
(1) by telephone;
(2) over the Internet; or
(3) through the mail or another delivery system;
and the e-liquid, e-liquid product, or vapor device is shipped through
a delivery service. "Delivery sale" does not include a sale of an
e-liquid, an e-liquid product, or a vapor device not for personal
consumption to a person who is a retailer.".
Page 7, line 32, strike "vapor".
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

47
Page 7, line 32, delete "devices." and insert "e-liquid or e-liquid
products.".
Page 7, delete lines 39 through 42, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"SECTION 16. IC 7.1-7-2-12.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.5. (a) "Foreign adversary
product" means an:
(1) e-liquid;
(2) e-liquid containing an ingredient; or
(3) e-liquid product;
that is manufactured by, sourced from, or otherwise imported
from a nation listed as a foreign adversary in 15 CFR 791.4.
(b) The term does not include the following:
(1) A vapor device, including a part to be utilized in an open
or closed system to convert e-liquid to a vapor for inhalation.
(2) E-liquid or an e-liquid product that is manufactured by,
sourced from, or otherwise imported from a nation listed as
a foreign adversary in 15 CFR 791.4, if the e-liquid or e-liquid
product:
(A) has been approved or authorized be the federal Food
and Drug Administration; or
(B) is pending review by the federal Food and Drug
Administration under 21 U.S.C. 387j.
SECTION 17. IC 7.1-7-2-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. "Manufacturer" means a person located inside
or outside Indiana that is engaged in manufacturing:
(1) e-liquid for closed and open system vapor devices; or
(2) e-liquid products.".
Page 8, delete lines 1 through 9.
Page 8, between lines 14 and 15, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 18. IC 7.1-7-2-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2017,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. "Manufacturing" means the process by which
an:
(1) e-liquid is mixed, bottled, and packaged; and
(2) e-liquid product is produced and packaged.
SECTION 19. IC 7.1-7-2-18, AS ADDED BY P.L.176-2015,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. "Permit" means a written authorization issued
by the commission entitling the holder to manufacture, sell, or
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

48
otherwise deal in e-liquid or e-liquid products, as provided in this
article.
SECTION 20. IC 7.1-7-2-21, AS ADDED BY P.L.176-2015,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 21. "Retailer" means a person, other than a
manufacturer, who in the ordinary course of the person's regular trade
or business:
(1) acquires any form of e-liquid or e-liquid product for the
purpose of resale; and
(2) transfers the e-liquid or e-liquid product to another person
for money or other consideration.".
Page 9, line 41, after "not" insert ", to the best of the
manufacturer's knowledge,".
Page 10, between lines 1 and 2, begin a new line block indented and
insert:
"(10) Evidence of the federal Food and Drug Administration
approval, authorization, or application status of each e-liquid
or e-liquid product the manufacturer seeks to sell, source,
import, or manufacture in the manner described under
IC 7.1-7-2-12.5(b)(2).".
Page 10, between lines 8 and 9, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(g) If the federal Food and Drug Administration denies a
manufacturer's application for approval or authorization of an
e-liquid or e-liquid product during the term of a permit issued
under this section, the manufacturer must notify the commission
of the denial and submit a supplemental application for a
manufacturing permit on a form prescribed by the commission.".
Page 10, line 37, after "not" insert ", to the best of the
manufacturer's knowledge,".
Page 10, between lines 39 and 40, begin a new line block indented
and insert:
"(9) Evidence of the federal Food and Drug Administration
approval, authorization, or application status of each e-liquid
or e-liquid product the manufacturer seeks to sell, source,
import, or manufacture in the manner described under
IC 7.1-7-2-12.5(b)(2).".
Page 10, between lines 41 and 42, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(d) If the federal Food and Drug Administration denies a
manufacturer's application for approval or authorization of an
e-liquid or e-liquid product during the term of a permit issued
under this section, the manufacturer must notify the commission
of the denial and submit a supplemental renewal application for a
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

49
manufacturing permit on a form prescribed by the commission.".
Page 10, delete line 42, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 23. IC 7.1-7-4-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.17-2019,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) As used in this section:
(1) "adulterated" means a product that:
(A) consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or
decomposed substance; or
(B) is contaminated by any added poisonous or added
deleterious substance that may render the product injurious to
health; and or
(C) is a foreign adversary product; and
(2) "tamper evident package" means a package having at least one
(1) indicator or barrier to entry that, if breached or missing, can
reasonably be expected to provide visible evidence to consumers
that tampering has occurred.
(b) A manufacturing facility shall comply with the following
requirements:
(1) An e-liquid container must use a child proof cap that has the
child resistant effectiveness set forth in the federal poison
prevention packaging standards, 16 CFR 1700.15(b)(1).
(2) An e-liquid container or e-liquid product must use a tamper
evident package. The tamper evident package feature must be
designed to and remain intact when handled in a reasonable
manner during the manufacture, distribution, and retail display of
the e-liquid container or e-liquid product.
(3) The label on an e-liquid container or e-liquid product must
meet the nicotine addictiveness warning statement requirements
set forth in 21 CFR 1143.3.
(4) The manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer may not add an
adulterated product to any e-liquid or e-liquid product produced
for sale in Indiana.
(5) The manufacturer must submit to random site visits by the
commission.
(6) The manufacturer may:
(A) own and control both the e-liquid or e-liquid product
manufacturing process and the bottling process; or
(B) subcontract with another manufacturer for the performance
of the e-liquid or e-liquid product manufacturing service, the
bottling services, or both services.
However, both the manufacturer performing a service under
clause (B) and the manufacturer for which the service is
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

50
performed must meet the requirements of this article, including
obtaining a permit.
(7) A manufacturer may use a flavoring, as defined by
IC 7.1-7-2-12, as an ingredient in an e-liquid or e-liquid product.
(8) The manufacturer or any person listed on the permit
application may not have been convicted within ten (10) years
before the date of application of:
(A) a federal crime having a sentence of at least one (1) year;
(B) an Indiana Class A, Class B, or Class C felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3,
Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014);
(C) a crime in a state other than Indiana having a penalty equal
to the penalty for an Indiana Class A, Class B, or Class C
felony (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level
1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014);
(D) an Indiana Class D felony involving a controlled substance
under IC 35-48-4 (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014)
or a Level 6 felony involving a controlled substance under
IC 35-48-4 (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014); or
(E) a crime in a state other than Indiana similar to a Class D
felony involving a controlled substance under IC 35-48-4 (for
a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 6 felony
involving a controlled substance under IC 35-48-4 (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014).".
Delete page 11.
Page 12, delete lines 1 through 26.
Page 12, line 29, delete "(a) This section does not apply to:".
Page 12, delete lines 30 through 38.
Page 12, line 39, delete "(b)" and insert "(a)".
Page 12, run in lines 29 through 39.
Page 12, line 40, delete "manufacture or source" and insert
"manufacture, source, possess, sell, or otherwise distribute".
Page 12, line 42, delete "(c)" and insert "(b)".
Page 13, line 3, delete "(d)" and insert "(c)".
Page 13, delete lines 6 through 42, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"SECTION 27. IC 7.1-7-5.5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2020,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. A retailer may not make a delivery sale of
e-liquid, an e-liquid product, or a vapor device to an individual who
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

51
does not meet the minimum age requirement as set forth in
IC 7.1-7-6-5.
SECTION 28. IC 7.1-7-5-1.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.220-2023,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.1. (a) A retailer must have a valid sales
certificate issued by the commission in accordance with
IC 7.1-3-18.5-1 that contains a separate box to check for identifying a
retailer that sells e-liquids or e-liquid products.
(b) A retailer may purchase e-liquid or an e-liquid product only
from an Indiana e-liquid manufacturing permit holder or an Indiana
distributor wholesaler permit holder.
(c) A retailer shall retain all invoices for e-liquid and e-liquid
products that the retailer purchases for two (2) years.
(d) A retailer shall not allow the self-service sale for individuals
purchasing an e-liquid or e-liquid product.
(e) A retailer may not sell an e-liquid or e-liquid product that
contains more than seventy-five (75) milligrams per milliliter of
nicotine.
(f) A manufacturer must have an e-liquid a manufacturing permit
issued under IC 7.1-7-4.
(g) A distributor wholesaler that does not have a valid e-liquid
manufacturing permit issued under IC 7.1-7-4 must have a valid
distributor's license wholesale tobacco sales certificate issued under
IC 6-7-2-8. IC 7.1-3-18.5-1.5.
(h) A distributor wholesaler shall purchase and distribute e-liquid
or e-liquid products from an:
(1) Indiana e-liquid manufacturer that has a valid e-liquid
manufacturing permit under IC 7.1-7-4; or
(2) Indiana e-liquid distributor wholesaler that has a valid:
(A) e-liquid manufacturing permit issued under IC 7.1-7-4; or
(B) distributor's license wholesale tobacco sales certificate
under IC 6-7-2-8. IC 7.1-3-18.5-1.5.
(i) A distributor wholesaler shall retain all invoices to a retailer or
from a manufacturer for at least two (2) years.
(j) A manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, or retailer may not
market e-liquid or an e-liquid product as a modified risk tobacco
product, as defined by IC 7.1-7-2-17.5, that has not been designated as
a modified risk tobacco product by the federal Food and Drug
Administration.
(k) Except as provided in subsection (m), a manufacturer including
a manufacturer of a closed system vapor product, permitted or
required to be permitted under IC 7.1-7-4 shall annually submit a
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

52
report to the commission setting forth:
(1) each new product that the manufacturer is producing and is
sold in Indiana with a list of the contents and ingredients by
volume; and
(2) whether the manufacturer has stopped producing products
previously produced and sold in Indiana.
A report under this subsection is confidential, and the commission may
not disclose it to another person.
(l) A manufacturer permitted or required to be permitted under
IC 7.1-7-4 shall annually submit a report to the commission setting
forth:
(1) the milligrams per milliliter of nicotine in each product the
manufacturer produces; and
(2) the milliliters of each product sold that current year.
A report under this subsection is confidential, and the ATC
commission may not disclose it to another person.
(m) A manufacturer is not required to submit a report described in
subsection (k) if the manufacturer submits to the commission a
certification, by October 1 of each year, that each of the manufacturer's
vapor products e-liquid or e-liquid products sold in Indiana has have
been filed with the federal Food and Drug Administration.".
Page 14, delete lines 1 through 22.
Page 14, between lines 30 and 31, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 30. IC 7.1-7-5.5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2020,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. A retailer may not ship an e-liquid, an e-liquid
product, or a vapor device without first making a good faith effort to
verify the age of the purchaser of the e-liquid, e-liquid product, or
vapor device as set forth in IC 7.1-7-6-6.
SECTION 31. IC 7.1-7-5.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2020,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Before an e-liquid or e-liquid product is
shipped in a delivery sale, a retailer must be fully paid for the purchase
and shall accept payment from the purchaser:
(1) by a check drawn on an account in the purchaser's name;
(2) by a credit card issued in the purchaser's name; or
(3) by a debit card issued in the purchaser's name.
(b) A retailer may ship an e-liquid or e-liquid product only to a
purchaser.
SECTION 33. IC 7.1-7-5.5-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2020,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. A retailer who ships an e-liquid, an e-liquid
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

53
product, or a vapor device from a delivery sale order shall include as
part of the shipping documents a document with the following
statement: "E-LIQUIDS: Indiana law prohibits the sale of this product
to a person who is less than 21 years of age.".".
Page 14, line 42, reset in roman "sole".
Page 14, line 42, delete "dual".
Page 15, line 1, after "Administration" insert ".".
Page 15, line 1, delete "and the commission and may".
Page 15, delete line 2.
Page 15, line 3, delete "Administration and the commission.".
Page 15, line 7, after "article" insert ". The commission shall
revoke the permit, tobacco sales certificate, or wholesaler tobacco
sales certificate of a manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer that
violates the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act or a federal rule
promulgated under the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.".
Page 15, delete lines 8 through 10.
Page 15, delete lines 16 through 18, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"SECTION 35. IC 7.1-7-6-2.1, AS ADDED BY P.L.49-2020,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.1. A person who sells or distributes an e-liquid,
an e-liquid product, or a vapor device to a person less than
twenty-one (21) years of age may be in violation of IC 35-46-1.
SECTION 36. IC 7.1-7-6-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2020,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. A person who knowingly or intentionally makes
a delivery sale of an e-liquid, e-liquid product, or a vapor device to
an individual who is less than twenty-one (21) years of age commits a
Class C infraction.
SECTION 37. IC 7.1-7-6-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2020,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) As used in this section, "good faith effort to
verify the age of the purchaser of the e-liquid, e-liquid product, or
vapor device" means:
(1) verifying the age of the purchaser in a commercially available
database; or
(2) obtaining a photocopy of a government issued identification;
that indicates the birth date or age of the purchaser.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally ships an e-liquid, an
e-liquid product, or a vapor device without first making a good faith
effort to verify the age of the purchaser of the e-liquid, e-liquid
product, or vapor device commits a Class C infraction.".
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137

54
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
(Reference is to ESB 185 as printed February 12, 2026.)
MANNING
ES 185—LS 6454/DI 137